District of Columbia statutes.
32-515

Family and Medical Leave Commission established.

Expired.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 36-1315.

Editor's Notes

Expiration of Family and Medical Leave Commission: Subsection (e) of former § 36-1315, which was derived from D.C. Law 8-181, § 16, provided that the Family and Medical Leave Commission “shall continue in existence for 5 years at which time the Commission shall terminate unless the Council determines that the Commission shall continue in existence or be reestablished.” The Family and Medical Leave Commission is deemed to have expired October 3, 1995.